Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.160

District judge may act as coroner.

If the office of coroner is vacant, or the coroner is absent or unable to attend, the duties of the coroner's office may be performed by any district judge in the county with the like authority and subject to the same obligations and penalties as the coroner. For such service a district judge shall be entitled to the same fees, payable in the same manner.

[ 1987 c 202 s 204; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.160. Prior: (i) Code 1881 s 2793; 1863 p 562 s 19; 1854 p 438 s 19; RRS s 4198. (ii) Code 1881 s 2795; 1863 p 562 s 21; 1854 p 438 s 21; RRS s 4199.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.